District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-321

Purpose; authorization of Board to construct, maintain, and operate Stadium; plans.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 7, 1957, 71 Stat. 619, Pub. L. 85-300, § 2
July 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 421, Pub. L. 85-561, § 1(1), (2)
Sept. 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 702, Pub. L. 86-378, § 1(1)
Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 21(a)(1), 41 DCR 4636

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-321.
1973 Ed., § 2-1720.

Construction of Law

Construction of Law 10-152

Section 19(c) of D.C. Law 10-152 provided that the provisions of the act are to be liberally construed so as to effectuate those powers which are specifically enumerated.

Transfer of Functions

Section 19(b) of D.C. Law 10-152 provided that all references to the Armory Board in subchapter II of Chapter 3 of Title 2 subchapter II of Chapter 3 of Title 3, 2001 Ed. are hereinafter intended to be references to the Sports Commission unless the clear meaning requires otherwise.

Editor's Notes

Appropriations authorized: Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2363, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided for the Starplex Fund, $8,717,000 from other funds for expenses incurred by the Armory Board in the exercise of its powers granted by this subchapter and subchapter II of this chapter: Provided, That the Mayor shall submit a budget for the Armory Board for the forthcoming fiscal year as required by § 47-301(b).

Effect of dissolution of Sports Commission: Section 19(d) of D.C. Law 10-152 provided that if the Sports Commission is dissolved by repeal of the act or ceases to exist for any reason, all of its assets (including, but not limited to, cash, accounts receivable, reserve funds, real or personal property and contract and other rights) shall automatically be assigned to and become the property of the District.